District of Columbia statutes.
50-1910

Chemical testing after arrest.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any person who operates or who is in physical control of any watercraft within the District and a law enforcement officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person is operating or in physical control of a watercraft while intoxicated or while the person’s ability to operate a watercraft is impaired by the consumption of alcohol or a drug or a combination thereof, after arrest shall:

(1)

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, be deemed to have given his or her consent, subject to the provisions of this chapter, to submitting 2 specimens for chemical testing of the person’s blood, breath, or urine, for the purpose of determining alcohol or drug content; and

(2)

Submit 2 specimens for chemical testing of his or her blood, breath, or urine for the purpose of determining alcohol or drug content when he or she is involved in a collision in the District.

(b)

When a person is required to submit specimens for chemical testing pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, a law enforcement officer shall elect which types of specimens will be collected from the person and the law enforcement officer or a medical professional shall collect the specimen subject to the restriction in § 50-1903(a); provided, that the person may object to a particular type of specimen collection for chemical testing on valid religious or medical grounds. If a person objects to blood collection on valid religious or medical grounds, that person shall only be required to submit breath or urine specimens for collection.

(c)

In addition to submitting specimens for chemical testing as provided in this section, a person may also submit specimens for chemical testing administered to him or her by a medical professional of his or her own choosing. The failure or inability of the person to obtain additional specimens or chemical tests shall not preclude the admission of chemical tests results that were the product of the law enforcement officer’s request.

(d)

Before collecting specimens for chemical testing, the law enforcement officer shall advise the operator of the watercraft about the requirements of this chapter.

Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1017, Pub. L. 92-519, § 7c
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 101(e), 59 DCR 12957
This section is referenced in § 50-1911.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 added this section.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 101(e) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 101(e) of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).